Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6110.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-18-60 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-60. Sealing and unsealing of court files.
(a) Actions arising under §§ 34-18-35, 34-18-36, and 34-18-38 may be sealed by the court
upon motion by any party or parties filed at least thirty (30) days after the expiration of the appeal
period following the conclusion of the underlying civil action.
(b) In ruling on the motion to seal, the court shall grant the motion and seal the record of
the civil action upon a finding that the underlying civil action was dismissed as a result of a motion
to dismiss, the action was resolved by stipulation and the terms of the stipulation have been satisfied
by the parties, any monetary judgment against the moving party has been satisfied in full, or the
action has been dismissed for lack of prosecution after a five-year (5) period. The court shall also
make a finding that the moving party notified all parties to the underlying civil action of their
motion to seal the record and that motion is the only request made under this section by the moving
party within the previous five (5) years.
(c) Any party to an action arising under §§ 34-18-35, 34-18-36, and 34-18-38 may file a
motion to seal the record of the action upon satisfaction of the requirements set forth in subsections
(a) and (b) of this section. Parties requesting seal of their record under this section are limited to
one request every five (5) years.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002091
========
LC002091 - Page 2 of 3